Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1

General Provisions

11-14-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Natural Areas Preservation Act of 1971.”

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1701.

Cross-References. Agricultural, Forest and Open Space Land Act, title 67, ch. 5, part 10.

Local parks land acquisition fund, § 67-4-409.

Natural resources trust fund, title 11, ch. 14, part 3.

State lands acquisition fund, § 67-4-409.

11-14-102. Purpose.

The general assembly finds that in the countryside of Tennessee there are areas possessing scenic, scientific, including biological, geological and/or recreational values, and which are in prospect and peril of being destroyed or substantially diminished by actions such as dumping of refuse, commercialization, construction, changing of population densities or similar actions, there being either no regulations by the state or by local governments or regulations which are inadequate or so poorly enforced as not to yield adequate protection to such areas. It is the intention of the general assembly to provide protection for such areas.

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 2; T.C.A., § 11-1702.

11-14-103. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Area” means an area of land or water, or both, whether in public or private ownership, which has scenic, natural, or scientific values;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation;

“Local government” means the government of a county or municipality; and

“System” means collectively the areas, whether scenic, natural or scientific, which will be placed in this part and which shall receive the preservation and protection that is provided by this part.

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-1703.

11-14-104. Administration — Report on implementation.

This part shall be administered by the department, in cooperation with the wildlife resources agency, acting as an advisory body.

The commissioner is authorized to make and shall enforce certain regulations necessary for the preservation and enhancement of the values herein protected, and for control of recreational, educational, scientific and other uses of these areas in a manner that shall not impair them.

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 4, 6; T.C.A., § 11-1704; Acts 2013, ch. 93, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning deadline of February 1, 1972, to make recommendations regarding the administration and implementation of this program and to request funding, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

11-14-105. Classifications.

There shall be two (2) classes of areas within the meaning of this part:

Class I, scenic-recreational areas, which are areas associated with and containing waterfalls, natural bridges, natural lakes, small but scenic brooks or streams, gorges, coves, woodlands, caverns or other similar features or phenomena, which are unique in scenic and recreational value and not extensive enough for a state park but worthy of perpetual preservation; and

Class II, natural-scientific areas, which are areas associated with and containing floral assemblages, forest types, fossil assemblages, geological phenomena, hydrological phenomena, swamplands and other similar features or phenomena which are unique in natural or scientific value and are worthy of perpetual preservation.

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 5; T.C.A., § 11-1705.

11-14-106. Development permitted.

The following development shall be permitted in the two (2) classes of areas:

Class I areas may be developed with foot trails, foot bridges, overlooks, primitive campgrounds and small picnic areas with associated sanitary facilities;

Class II areas may be developed with foot trails, foot bridges, overlooks and primitive campgrounds; and

Either class may be developed with such facilities as may be reasonably necessary for the dissemination of educational material and for the safe and proper management and protection of the area; provided, that no such facility shall be constructed or sited in such a manner as to be inconsistent with the preservation of the natural or scientific values in a Class II area or as an intrusion upon the scenic and recreational values in a Class I area.

The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations for each natural area, specifying the activity or activities permitted. Such permissible activities shall not be inconsistent with the purpose of perpetual preservation. If, in the discretion of the commissioner, any portion of an area is deemed to be of so fragile a nature that overuse may damage it, limitations may be placed on activities within those portions. Removal of plants, animals or geological specimens shall not be permitted except by permit issued by the commissioner. If hunting or fishing are among the activities permitted by the commissioner, the commissioner shall adopt, with the advice of the wildlife resources agency, rules and regulations to regulate such activity on the natural area in question. Such rules and regulations may be more restrictive than the rules and regulations adopted for statewide hunting and fishing by the wildlife resources agency.

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 6; 1978, ch. 634, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1706.

Attorney General Opinions. A road project that is not expressly contemplated under the current rules may only be permitted as a deviation under the natural resource area's master plan if it will accord with the act's stated purpose and the respective resource legislation, OAG 01-170, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (12/12/01).

11-14-107. Reports by department.

The department shall submit annually to each succeeding general assembly proposals for additions and alterations to Class I or Class II areas, or for improvements to this program. Each proposal shall specify the category of the proposed addition and shall be accompanied by a report on the factors which, in the judgment of the department, make the area a worthy addition to the system. The department shall consult with citizens' organizations in the administration of this part as much as possible. The department shall give notice to the public and an opportunity for public comment on any proposal to designate a new natural area or to modify the acreage of any designated natural area.

Acts 1971, ch. 116, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 4, 6; T.C.A., § 11-1707; Acts 2004, ch. 947, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

The former first sentence, concerning submission of a list of Class I and II areas to be initially made part of the system, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 947, § 3 provided that the Shelby County Commission and the Shelby Farm Park Board shall be responsible for monitoring the activities occurring on the trails in the Lucius E. Burch, Jr. Natural Area and shall also take appropriate enforcement action as provided by this part against any action prohibited by this part.

Attorney General Opinions. Only the general assembly has the authority to make alterations to or deletions from the classification system set out in the Natural Areas Preservation Act, OAG 01-170, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (12/12/01).